California statutes. Public Resources Code
21092.3.

The notices required pursuant to Sections 21080.4 and 21092 for an environmental impact report shall be posted in the office and on the internet website of the county clerk of each county in which the project will be located and shall remain posted for a period of 30 days. The notice required pursuant to Section 21092 for a negative declaration shall be so posted for a period of 20 days, unless otherwise required by law to be posted for 30 days. The county clerk shall post the notices within 24 hours of receipt.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 97, Sec. 6.   (AB 819)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

21092.4.

(a) For a project of statewide, regional, or areawide significance, the lead agency shall consult with transportation planning agencies and public agencies that have transportation facilities within their jurisdictions that could be affected by the project. Consultation shall be conducted in the same manner as for responsible agencies pursuant to this division, and shall be for the purpose of the lead agency obtaining information concerning the project’s effect on major local arterials, public transit, freeways, highways, overpasses, on-ramps, off-ramps, and rail transit service within the jurisdiction of a transportation planning agency or a public agency that is consulted by the lead agency. A transportation planning agency or public agency that provides information to the lead agency shall be notified of, and provided with copies of, environmental documents pertaining to the project.

(b) As used in this section, “transportation facilities” includes major local arterials and public transit within five miles of the project site and freeways, highways, overpasses, on-ramps, off-ramps, and rail transit service within 10 miles of the project site.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 707, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

21092.5.

(a) At least 10 days prior to certifying an environmental impact report, the lead agency shall provide a written proposed response to a public agency on comments made by that agency which conform with the requirements of this division. Proposed responses shall conform with the legal standards established for responses to comments on draft environmental impact reports. Copies of responses or the environmental document in which they are contained, prepared in conformance with other requirements of this division and the guidelines adopted pursuant to Section 21083, may be used to meet the requirements imposed by this section. 

(b) The lead agency shall notify any public agency which comments on a negative declaration, of the public hearing or hearings, if any, on the project for which the negative declaration was prepared. If notice to the commenting public agency is provided pursuant to Section 21092, the notice shall satisfy the requirement of this subdivision. 

(c) Nothing in this section requires the lead agency to respond to comments not received within the comment periods specified in this division, to reopen comment periods, or to delay acting on a negative declaration or environmental impact report.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 905, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

21092.6.

(a) The lead agency shall consult the lists compiled pursuant to Section 65962.5 of the Government Code to determine whether the project and any alternatives are located on a site which is included on any list. The lead agency shall indicate whether a site is on any list not already identified by the applicant. The lead agency shall specify the list and include the information in the statement required pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 65962.5 of the Government Code, in the notice required pursuant to Section 21080.4, a negative declaration, and a draft environmental impact report. The requirement in this section to specify any list shall not be construed to limit compliance with this division.

(b) If a project or any alternatives are located on a site which is included on any of the lists compiled pursuant to Section 65962.5 of the Government Code and the lead agency did not accurately specify or did not specify any list pursuant to subdivision (a), the California Environmental Protection Agency shall notify the lead agency specifying any list with the site when it receives notice pursuant to Section 21080.4, a negative declaration, and a draft environmental impact report. The California Environmental Protection Agency shall not be liable for failure to notify the lead agency pursuant to this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 548, Sec. 8.   (AB 2669)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

21093.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that tiering of environmental impact reports will promote construction of needed housing and other development projects by (1) streamlining regulatory procedures, (2) avoiding repetitive discussions of the same issues in successive environmental impact reports, and (3) ensuring that environmental impact reports prepared for later projects which are consistent with a previously approved policy, plan, program, or ordinance concentrate upon environmental effects which may be mitigated or avoided in connection with the decision on each later project. The Legislature further finds and declares that tiering is appropriate when it helps a public agency to focus upon the issues ripe for decision at each level of environmental review and in order to exclude duplicative analysis of environmental effects examined in previous environmental impact reports.

(b) To achieve this purpose, environmental impact reports shall be tiered whenever feasible, as determined by the lead agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 418, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

21094.

(a) Where a prior environmental impact report has been prepared and certified for a program, plan, policy, or ordinance, the lead agency for a later project that meets the requirements of this section shall examine significant effects of the later project upon the environment by using a tiered environmental impact report, except that the report on the later project is not required to examine those effects that the lead agency determines were either of the following:

(1) Mitigated or avoided pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 21081 as a result of the prior environmental impact report.

(2) Examined at a sufficient level
 of detail in the prior environmental impact report to enable those effects to be mitigated or avoided by site-specific revisions, the imposition of conditions, or by other means in connection with the approval of the later project.

(b) This section applies only to a later project that the lead agency determines is all of the following:

(1) Consistent with the program, plan, policy, or ordinance for which an environmental impact report has been prepared and certified.

(2) Consistent with applicable local land use plans and zoning of the city, county, or city and county in which the later project would be located.

(3) Not subject to Section 21166.

(c) For purposes of compliance with this
 section, an initial study shall be prepared to assist the lead agency in making the determinations required by this section. The initial study shall analyze whether the later project may cause significant effects on the environment that were not examined in the prior environmental impact report.

(d) All public agencies that propose to carry out or approve the later project may utilize the prior environmental impact report and the environmental impact report on the later project to fulfill the requirements of Section 21081.

(e) When tiering is used pursuant to this section, an environmental impact report prepared for a later project shall refer to the prior environmental impact report and state where a copy of the prior environmental impact report may be examined.

(f) This section shall become operative on January 1,
 2016.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 3.5) and added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 496, Sec. 4.   (SB 1456)   Effective September 29, 2010.   Section operative January 1, 2016, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

21094.5.

(a) (1) If an environmental impact report was certified for a planning level decision of a city or county, the application of this division to the approval of an infill project shall be limited to the effects on the environment that (A) are specific to the project or to the project site and were not addressed as significant effects in the prior environmental impact report or (B) substantial new information shows the effects will be more significant than described in the prior environmental impact report. A lead agency’s determination pursuant to this section shall be supported by substantial evidence.

(2) An effect of a project upon the environment shall not be considered a
 specific effect of the project or a significant effect that was not considered significant in a prior environmental impact report, or an effect that is more significant than was described in the prior environmental impact report if uniformly applicable development policies or standards adopted by the city, county, or the lead agency, would apply to the project and the lead agency makes a finding, based upon substantial evidence, that the development policies or standards will substantially mitigate that effect.

(b) If an infill project would result in significant effects that are specific to the project or the project site, or if the significant effects of the infill project were not addressed in the prior environmental impact report, or are more significant than the effects addressed in the prior environmental impact report, and if a mitigated negative declaration or a sustainable communities environmental assessment could not be otherwise
 adopted, an environmental impact report prepared for the project analyzing those effects shall be limited as follows:

(1) Alternative locations, densities, and building intensities to the project need not be considered.

(2) Growth inducing impacts of the project need not be considered.

(c) This section applies to an infill project that satisfies both of the following:

(1) The project satisfies any of the following:

(A) Is consistent with the general use designation, density, building intensity, and applicable policies specified for the project area in either a sustainable communities strategy or an alternative planning strategy for which the State Air Resources Board, pursuant to
 subparagraph (H) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 65080 of the Government Code, has accepted a metropolitan planning organization’s determination that the sustainable communities strategy or the alternative planning strategy would, if implemented, achieve the greenhouse gas emission reduction targets.

(B) Consists of a small walkable community project located in an area designated by a city for that purpose.

(C) Is located within the boundaries of a metropolitan planning organization that has not yet adopted a sustainable communities strategy or alternative planning strategy, and the project has a residential density of at least 20 units per acre or a floor area ratio of at least 0.75.

(2) Satisfies all applicable statewide performance standards contained in the guidelines adopted pursuant to Section
 21094.5.5.

(d) This section applies after the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency adopts and certifies the guidelines establishing statewide standards pursuant to Section 21094.5.5.

(e) For the purposes of this section, the following terms mean the following:

(1) “Infill project” means a project that meets the following conditions:

(A) Consists of any one, or combination, of the following uses:

(i) Residential.

(ii) Retail or commercial, where no more than one-half of the project area is used for parking.

(iii) A transit station.

(iv) A school.

(v) A public office building.

(B) Is located within an urban area on a site that has been previously developed, or on a vacant site where at least 75 percent of the perimeter of the site adjoins, or is separated only by an improved public right-of-way from, parcels that are developed with qualified urban uses.

(2) “Planning level decision” means the enactment or amendment of a general plan, community plan, specific plan, or zoning code.

(3) “Prior environmental impact report” means the environmental impact report certified for a planning level decision, as supplemented by any subsequent or supplemental environmental impact reports, negative declarations, or addenda to those
 documents.

(4) “Small walkable community project” means a project that is in an incorporated city, which is not within the boundary of a metropolitan planning organization and that satisfies the following requirements:

(A) Has a project area of approximately one-quarter mile diameter of contiguous land completely within the existing incorporated boundaries of the city.

(B) Has a project area that includes a residential area adjacent to a retail downtown area.

(C) The project has a density of at least eight dwelling units per acre or a floor area ratio for retail or commercial use of not less than 0.50.

(5) “Urban area” includes either an incorporated city or an unincorporated area that is
 completely surrounded by one or more incorporated cities that meets both of the following criteria:

(A) The population of the unincorporated area and the population of the surrounding incorporated cities equal a population of 100,000 or more.

(B) The population density of the unincorporated area is equal to, or greater than, the population density of the surrounding cities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 469, Sec. 6.   (SB 226)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

21094.5.5.

(a) The Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation shall prepare, develop, and transmit to the Natural Resources Agency for certification and adoption guidelines for the implementation of Section 21094.5 and the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency, on or before January 1, 2013, shall certify and adopt the guidelines.

(b) The guidelines prepared pursuant to this section shall include statewide standards for infill projects that may be amended from time to time and promote all of the following:

(1) The implementation of the land use and transportation policies in the Sustainable Communities and Climate Protection Act of 2008 (Chapter 728 of the Statutes of 2008).

(2) The state planning priorities specified in Section 65041.1 of the Government Code and in the most recently adopted Environmental Goals and Policy Report issued by the Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation supporting infill development.

(3) The reduction of greenhouse gas emissions under the California Global Warming Solutions Act of 2006 (Division 25.5 (commencing with Section 38500) of the Health and Safety Code).

(4) The reduction in per capita water use pursuant to Section 10608.16 of the Water Code.

(5) The creation of a transit village development district consistent with Section 65460.1 of the Government Code.

(6) Substantial energy efficiency improvements, including improvements to projects related to transportation energy.

(7) Protection of public health, including the health of vulnerable populations from air or water pollution, or soil contamination.

(c) On
 or before January 1, 2027, and at least once every two years thereafter, in order to better incentivize affordable and smart infill housing growth pursuant to Section 21094.5, the guidelines prepared pursuant to this section shall be updated in a manner that complies with Section 21094.5 in order to address any rigid requirements, lack of clarity in vague terminology, and the potential for excessive exposure to frivolous litigation over lead agency determinations to make tiering under Section 21094.5 work more effectively in compliance with this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 24, Sec. 18.   (SB 131)   Effective June 30, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21095.

(a) The Resources Agency, in consultation with the Office of Planning and Research, shall develop an amendment to Appendix G of the state guidelines, for adoption pursuant to Section 21083, to provide lead agencies an optional methodology to ensure that significant effects on the environment of agricultural land conversions are quantitatively and consistently considered in the environmental review process.

(b) The Department of Conservation, in consultation with the United States Department of Agriculture pursuant to Section 658.6 of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and in consultation with the Resources Agency and the Office of Planning and Research, shall develop a state model land evaluation and site assessment system, contingent upon the availability of funding from non-General Fund sources. The department shall seek funding for that purpose from non-General Fund sources, including, but not limited to, the United States Department of Agriculture.

(c) In lieu of developing an amendment to Appendix G of the state guidelines pursuant to subdivision (a), the Resources Agency may adopt the state model land evaluation and site assessment system developed pursuant to subdivision (b) as that amendment to Appendix G.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 812, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

21096.

(a) If a lead agency prepares an environmental impact report for a project situated within airport land use compatibility plan boundaries, or, if an airport land use compatibility plan has not been adopted, for a project within two nautical miles of a public airport or public use airport, the Airport Land Use Planning Handbook published by the Division of Aeronautics of the Department of Transportation, in compliance with Section 21674.5 of the Public Utilities Code and other documents, shall be utilized as technical resources to assist in the preparation of the environmental impact report as the report relates to airport-related safety hazards and noise problems.

(b) A lead agency shall not adopt a negative declaration for a project described in subdivision (a) unless the lead agency considers whether the project will result in a safety hazard or noise problem for persons using the airport or for persons residing or working in the project area.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 438, Sec. 8.5.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

21097.

This division does not apply to the San Quentin Rehabilitation Center, San Quentin: Demolition of Building 38 and Construction of New Educational and Vocational Center project and the San Quentin Rehabilitation Center, San Quentin: Improvement Projects located on the grounds of the San Quentin Rehabilitation Center.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 47, Sec. 27.   (AB 134)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

21098.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Low-level flight path” includes any flight path for any aircraft owned, maintained, or that is under the jurisdiction of the United States Department of Defense that flies lower than 1,500 feet above ground level, as indicated in the United States Department of Defense Flight Information Publication, “Area Planning Military Training Routes: North and South America (AP/1B)” published by the United States National Imagery and Mapping Agency.

(2) “Military impact zone” includes any area, including airspace, that meets both of the following criteria:

(A) Is within two miles of a military installation, including, but not limited to, any base, military airport, camp, post, station, yard, center, homeport facility for a ship, or any other military activity center that is under the jurisdiction of the United States Department of Defense.

(B) Covers greater than 500 acres of unincorporated land, or greater than 100 acres of city incorporated land.

(3) “Military service” means any branch of the United States Armed Forces.

(4) “Special use airspace” means the area underlying the airspace that is designated for training, research, development, or evaluation for a military service, as that area is established by the United States Department of Defense Flight Information Publication, “Area Planning: Special Use Airspace: North and South America (AP/1A)”
 published by the United States National Imagery and Mapping Agency.

(b) If the United States Department of Defense or a military service notifies a lead agency of the contact office and address for the military service and the specific boundaries of a low-level flight path, military impact zone, or special use airspace, the lead agency shall submit notices, as required pursuant to Sections 21080.4 and 21092, to the military service if the project is within those boundaries and any of the following apply:

(1) The project includes a general plan amendment.

(2) The project is of statewide, regional, or areawide significance.

(3) The project is required to be referred to the airport land use commission, or appropriately designated body, pursuant to Article
 3.5 (commencing with Section 21670) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 9 of the Public Utilities Code.

(c) The requirement to submit notices imposed by this section does not apply to any of the following:

(1) Response actions taken pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 78000) of Division 45 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) Response actions taken pursuant to Chapter 6.86 (commencing with Section 25396) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) Sites subject to corrective action orders issued pursuant to Section 25187 of the Health and Safety
 Code.

(d) (1) The effect or potential effect that a project may have on military activities does not itself constitute an adverse effect on the environment for purposes of this division.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a project’s impact on military activities may cause, or be associated with, adverse effects on the environment that are subject to the requirements of this division, including, but not limited to, Section 21081.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 258, Sec. 117.   (AB 2327)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2024, pursuant to Sec. 130 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 258.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2.7. Modernization of Transportation Analysis for Transit-Oriented Infill Projects [21099. - 21099.5.]

21099.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms mean the following:

(1) “Employment center project” means a project located on property zoned for commercial uses with a floor area ratio of no less than 0.75 and that is located within a transit priority area.

(2) “Floor area ratio” means the ratio of gross building area of the development, excluding structured parking areas, proposed for the project divided by the net lot area.

(3) “Gross building area” means the sum of all finished areas of all floors of a building included within the outside faces of its exterior walls.

(4) “Infill site” means a lot located within an urban area that has been previously developed, or on a vacant site where at least 75 percent of the perimeter of the site adjoins, or is separated only by an improved public right-of-way from, parcels that are developed with qualified urban uses.

(5) “Lot” means all parcels utilized by the project.

(6) “Net lot area” means the area of a lot, excluding publicly dedicated land and private streets that meet local standards, and other public use areas as determined by the local land use authority.

(7) “Transit priority area” means an area within one-half mile of a major transit stop that is existing or planned, if the planned stop is scheduled to be completed within the planning horizon included in a Transportation Improvement Program or applicable regional
 transportation plan.

(b) (1) The Office of Planning and Research shall prepare, develop, and transmit to the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency for certification and adoption proposed revisions to the guidelines adopted pursuant to Section 21083 establishing criteria for determining the significance of transportation impacts of projects within transit priority areas. Those criteria shall promote the reduction of greenhouse gas emissions, the development of multimodal transportation networks, and a diversity of land uses. In developing the criteria, the office shall recommend potential metrics to measure transportation impacts that may include, but are not limited to, vehicle miles traveled, vehicle miles traveled per capita, automobile trip generation rates, or automobile trips generated. The office may also establish criteria for models used to analyze transportation impacts to ensure the models are accurate,
 reliable, and consistent with the intent of this section.

(2) Upon certification of the guidelines by the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency pursuant to this section, automobile delay, as described solely by level of service or similar measures of vehicular capacity or traffic congestion, shall not be considered a significant impact on the environment pursuant to this division, except in locations specifically identified in the guidelines, if any.

(3) This subdivision does not relieve a public agency of the requirement to analyze a project’s potentially significant transportation impacts related to air quality, noise, safety, or any other impact associated with transportation. The methodology established by these guidelines shall not create a presumption that a project will not result in significant impacts related to air quality, noise, safety, or any other impact
 associated with transportation. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the adequacy of parking for a project shall not support a finding of significance pursuant to this section.

(4) This subdivision does not preclude the application of local general plan policies, zoning codes, conditions of approval, thresholds, or any other planning requirements pursuant to the police power or any other authority.

(5) On or before July 1, 2014, the Office of Planning and Research shall circulate a draft revision prepared pursuant to paragraph (1).

(c) (1) The Office of Planning and Research may adopt guidelines pursuant to Section 21083 establishing alternative metrics to the metrics used for traffic levels of service for transportation impacts outside transit priority areas. The alternative metrics may include the retention of traffic
 levels of service, where appropriate and as determined by the office.

(2) This subdivision shall not affect the standard of review that would apply to the new guidelines adopted pursuant to this section.

(d) (1) Aesthetic and parking impacts of a residential, mixed-use residential, or employment center project on an infill site within a transit priority area shall not be considered significant impacts on the environment.

(2) (A) This subdivision does not affect, change, or modify the authority of a lead agency to consider aesthetic impacts pursuant to local design review ordinances or other discretionary powers provided by other laws or policies.

(B) For the purposes of this subdivision, aesthetic impacts do
 not include impacts on historical or cultural resources.

(e) This section does not affect the authority of a public agency to establish or adopt thresholds of significance that are more protective of the environment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 466, Sec. 5.   (AB 1824)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

21099.5.

(a) On or before January 1, 2028, the Department of Housing and Community Development shall conduct and post on its internet website a study on how vehicle miles traveled is used as a metric for measuring transportation impacts of housing projects pursuant to this division.

(b) The Department of Housing and Community Development, in conducting the study, shall consult with local governments and other interested parties, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) State agencies, such as the Transportation Agency, the State Air Resources Board, the Department of Transportation, and the Office of Planning and Research.

(2) Local agencies, or organizations represented by member agencies, such as councils of government, metropolitan planning agencies, or regional transportation planning agencies, on a volunteer basis.

(3) Industry organizations, including those with specific expertise in analyzing traffic and housing impacts under this division, on a volunteer basis.

(c) The study shall include all of the following:

(1) An analysis of the implementation and outcomes of the guidelines described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 21099, as they pertain to housing projects.

(2) An analysis and comparison
 of how vehicle miles traveled impacts of mitigation measures are identified, measured, and deployed at the local, regional, and statewide level that shall include an exhaustive list of housing project types that are considered to increase capacity, induce vehicle miles traveled, or both. The analysis may include how the projected vehicle miles traveled is estimated for each mitigation strategy.

(3) A list of the cost of vehicle miles traveled mitigation measures to housing projects thus far, and an analysis of whether the cost of those measures either indefinitely delayed, temporarily delayed, or necessitated the phasing of those projects.

(4) (A) A list of housing project types, if any, that are exempted from analysis of vehicle miles traveled.

(B) The study may include
 an inventory of countywide regional vehicle miles traveled mitigation program framework studies that have been prepared for transportation or planning agencies, and summaries of the findings and conclusions of those studies.

(5) (A) An analysis of the differences in the availability and feasibility of mitigation measures to housing projects for vehicle miles traveled in rural, suburban, urban, and low vehicle miles traveled areas.

(B) The analysis shall include best strategies and planning changes to mitigate vehicle miles traveled in areas where public transportation or active transportation infrastructure is infeasible.

(6) A discussion of the relationship between vehicle miles traveled reduction, greenhouse gas emissions reduction, housing volume, housing
 affordability, transportation, economic development, public health, and equity.

(d) Implementation of this section is contingent upon an appropriation by the Legislature for purposes of this section in the annual Budget Act or another statute.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 773, Sec. 1.   (SB 768)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. State Agencies, Boards and Commissions [21100. - 21108.]

21100.

(a) All lead agencies shall prepare, or cause to be prepared by contract, and certify the completion of, an environmental impact report on any project which they propose to carry out or approve that may have a significant effect on the environment. Whenever feasible, a standard format shall be used for environmental impact reports.

(b) The environmental impact report shall include a detailed statement setting forth all of the following:

(1) All significant effects on the environment of the proposed project.

(2) In a separate section:

(A) Any significant effect on the environment that cannot be avoided if the project is implemented.

(B) Any significant effect on the environment that would be irreversible if the project is implemented.

(3) Mitigation measures proposed to minimize significant effects on the environment, including, but not limited to, measures to reduce the wasteful, inefficient, and unnecessary consumption of energy.

(4) Alternatives to the proposed project.

(5) The growth-inducing impact of the proposed project.

(c) The report shall also contain a statement briefly indicating the reasons for determining that various effects on the environment of a project are not significant and consequently have not been discussed in detail in the environmental impact report.

(d) For purposes of this section, any significant effect on the environment shall be limited to substantial, or potentially substantial, adverse changes in physical conditions which exist within the area as defined in Section 21060.5.

(e) Previously approved land use documents, including, but not limited to, general plans, specific plans, and local coastal plans, may be used in cumulative impact analysis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1230, Sec. 9.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

21100.1.

The information described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 21100 shall be required only in environmental impact reports prepared in connection with the following:

(a) The adoption, amendment, or enactment of a plan, policy, or ordinance of a public agency.

(b) The adoption by a local agency formation commission of a resolution making determinations.

(c) A project which will be subject to the requirement for preparing an environmental impact statement pursuant to the requirements of the National Environmental Policy Act of 1969.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1230, Sec. 10.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

21100.2.

(a) (1) For projects described in subdivision (c) of Section 21065, each state agency shall establish, by resolution or order, time limits that do not exceed the following:

(A) One year for completing and certifying environmental impact reports.

(B) One hundred eighty days for completing and adopting negative declarations.

(2) The time limits specified in paragraph (1) shall apply only to those circumstances in which the state agency is the lead agency for a project. These resolutions or orders may establish different time limits
 for different types or classes of projects, but all limits shall be measured from the date on which an application requesting approval of the project is received and accepted as complete by the state agency.

(3) No application for a project may be deemed incomplete for lack of a waiver of time periods prescribed in state regulations.

(4) The resolutions or orders required by this section may provide for a reasonable extension of the time period in the event that compelling circumstances justify additional time and the project applicant consents thereto.

(b) If a draft environmental impact report, environmental impact report, or focused environmental impact report is prepared under a contract to a state agency, the contract shall be executed within 45 days from the date on which the state agency sends a notice of
 preparation pursuant to Section 21080.4. The state agency may take longer to execute the contract if the project applicant and the state agency mutually agree to an extension of the time limit provided by this subdivision.

(c) This section shall become operative January 1, 2018.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 4) and added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 487, Sec. 5.   (AB 2564)   Effective September 23, 2012.   Section operative January 1, 2018, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

21101.

In regard to any proposed federal project in this state which may have a significant effect on the environment and on which the state officially comments, the state officials responsible for such comments shall include in their report a detailed statement setting forth the matters specified in Section 21100 prior to transmitting the comments of the state to the federal government. No report shall be transmitted to the federal government unless it includes such a detailed statement as to the matters specified in Section 21100.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1433.)
-------------------------------------------

21102.

No state agency, board, or commission shall request funds, nor shall any state agency, board, or commission which authorizes expenditures of funds, other than funds appropriated in the Budget Act, authorize funds for expenditure for any project, other than a project involving only feasibility or planning studies for possible future actions which the agency, board, or commission has not approved, adopted or funded, which may have a significant effect on the environment unless such request or authorization is accompanied by an environmental impact report.

Feasibility and planning studies exempted by this section from the preparation of an environmental impact report shall nevertheless include consideration of environmental factors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1154.)
-------------------------------------------

21104.

(a) Prior to completing an environmental impact report, the state lead agency shall consult with, and obtain comments from, each responsible agency, trustee agency, any public agency that has jurisdiction by law with respect to the project, and any city or county that borders on a city or county within which the project is located unless otherwise designated annually by agreement between the state lead agency and the city or county, and may consult with any person who has special expertise with respect to any environmental impact involved. In the case of a project described in subdivision (c) of Section 21065, the state lead agency shall, upon the request of the applicant, provide for early consultation to identify the range of actions, alternatives, mitigation measures, and significant effects to be analyzed in depth in the environmental impact report. The state lead agency may consult with persons identified by the applicant who the applicant believes will be concerned with the environmental effects of the project and may consult with members of the public who have made a written request to be consulted on the project. A request by the applicant for early consultation shall be made not later than 30 days after the determination required by Section 21080.1 with respect to the project.

(b) The state lead agency shall consult with, and obtain comments from, the State Air Resources Board in preparing an environmental impact report on a highway or freeway project, as to the air pollution impact of the potential vehicular use of the highway or freeway.

(c) A responsible agency or other public agency shall only make substantive comments regarding those activities involved in a project that are within an area of expertise of the agency or that are required to be carried out or approved by the agency. Those comments shall be supported by specific documentation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 744, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

21104.2.

The state lead agency shall consult with, and obtain written findings from, the Department of Fish and Game in preparing an environmental impact report on a project, as to the impact of the project on the continued existence of any endangered species or threatened species pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 2090) of Chapter 1.5 of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1240, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

21105.
